Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
Article 1 General Provisions

Cross references.

Requirements pertaining to providing of marine toilets or other disposal units on boats operated on waters of state, §

12-5-23

.

Law reviews.

For note on 1995 amendments of Code sections in this article, see 12 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 372 (1995).

For article, “SB 174: Revising Georgia’s List of Bail Restricted Offenses,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (2021).

52-7-1.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Boat Safety Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 1.

52-7-2.
Declaration of policy.

It is the policy of this state to promote safety for persons and property in and connected with the use, operation, and equipment of vessels and to promote the uniformity of laws relating thereto.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 2.

52-7-3.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

The term “alcohol concentration” means grams of alcohol per 100 milliliters of blood or grams of alcohol per 210 liters of breath.

(1.1)

“Blind point” means that portion of any of the waters of this state in which there is a natural or man-made obstruction which prevents the operator of a vessel from seeing vessels approaching from the opposite side of the obstruction, thus creating a safety hazard which could result in a boating accident.

“Board” means the Board of Natural Resources.

“Boat livery” means a business which holds any vessel for renting, leasing, or chartering.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of natural resources.

“Dealer” means any person engaged in the business of manufacturing vessels or selling new or used vessels at an established place of business.

“Department” means the Department of Natural Resources.

“Discharged” means, and shall include, spilled, leaked, pumped, poured, emitted, or dumped.

(7.1)

“Hazardous area” means any area which the commissioner has designated as such because of conditions which create a threat to the safety and welfare of boaters who may operate in such area.

“Holding tank” means any container which is designed to receive and hold sewage and other wastes discharged from a marine toilet and which is constructed and installed in such a manner that it can only be emptied by pumping out the contents of such holding tank.

(8.1)

“Homemade vessel” means any vessel that is built by an individual for personal use from raw materials that does not require the assignment of a federal hull identification number by a manufacturer pursuant to federal law. A person furnishing raw materials under a contract may be considered the builder of a homemade vessel. Antique boats, boats reconstructed from existing boat hulls, and rebuilt or reconstructed vessels are not considered homemade vessels.

(8.2)

“Hull identification number” or “HIN” means a number assigned to vessels by the manufacturer of the vessel or by the issuing authority of a state as required by the United States Coast Guard in accordance with federal law.

“Idle speed” means a slow speed maintained by the operator of a mechanically propelled vessel reached by engaging the engine of the vessel into said speed by reducing the throttle to a minimum.

(9.1)

“Issuing authority” means, as to this state, the Department of Natural Resources; and, as to other states, the state if it has a numbering system approved by the United States Coast Guard or the United States Coast Guard if the state that does not have an approved numbering system.

“Marine toilet” includes any equipment for installation on board a vessel which is designed to receive, retain, treat, or discharge sewage and any process to treat such sewage. A marine toilet must be equipped with a holding tank which can be emptied only by pumping out.

“Mechanically propelled vessel” means, for the purpose of determining fire extinguisher requirements, those vessels propelled by machinery using a volatile liquid for fuel.

“Nonmotorized vessel” means any vessel other than a sailboat which has no motor attached in a manner to make it readily available for operation.

“No wake” means that the wake or wash created by the movement of the vessel through the water is minimal.

“Operate” means to navigate or otherwise use a vessel which is not at anchor or moored, including vessels which are being paddled, are drifting, or are being powered by machinery.

“Operator” means the person who operates or has charge of the navigation or use of a vessel.

“Owner” means a person, other than a lienholder, having the property in or title to a vessel. The term includes a person entitled to the use or possession of a vessel subject to an interest in another person reserved or created by agreement and securing payment or performance of an obligation but the term excludes a lessee under a lease not intended as security.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, firm, corporation, association, or other legal entity.

“Personal flotation device” means any lifesaving device classified and approved by the regulations of the commandant of the United States Coast Guard.

“Portable marine toilet” means any device which is movable or portable and is not permanently installed on a vessel and which is designed to receive and temporarily retain sewage.

“Power boat” means any boat, vessel, or water-going craft which is propelled by mechanical rather than manual means whether or not such propulsion device forms an integral part of the structure thereof.

“Protected fresh waters” means the waters of Lake Allatoona, Lake Blackshear, Clarks Hill Lake, Hartwell Lake, Lake Sidney Lanier, Lake Oconee, Lake Seminole, Lake Sinclair, Russell Lake, Walter F. George Reservoir, and West Point Lake.

“Reportable boating accident” means an accident, collision, or other casualty involving a vessel subject to this article which results in loss of life, injury sufficient to cause incapacitation for at least 24 hours, or actual physical damage to property, including vessels, in excess of $2,000.00.

(22.1)

“Sailboard” means any sailboat whose unsupported mast is connected by a swivel or a flexible universal joint to a hull similar to the hull of a surfboard.

“Sewage” means human body wastes and the waste from toilets and other receptacles intended to receive or retain body wastes.

“Undocumented vessel” means a vessel which is not required to have and does not have a valid marine document issued by the United States Coast Guard or federal agency successor thereto.

“Vessel” means every description of watercraft, other than a seaplane on the water or a sailboard, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water and specifically includes, but is not limited to, inflatable rafts and homemade vessels; provided, however, that Code Section 52-7-18, relating to rules of the road for boat traffic, shall be applicable to sailboards.

“Visual distress signal” means a device that is approved and required by the commandant of the United States Coast Guard for the purpose of indicating a vessel in distress, including flares, smoke signals, and nonpyrotechnic signals.

“Waters of this state” means any waters within the territorial limits of this state and the marginal sea adjacent to this state and the high seas when navigated as a part of a journey or ride to or from the shore of this state. This definition shall not include privately owned ponds or lakes not open to the public.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 235, § 2; Ga. L. 1968, p. 487, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 3; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1632, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1182, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1743, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 738, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 567, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 410, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1343, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 230, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1218, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 998, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 680, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 52; Ga. L. 1995, p. 236, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 481, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 96, § 3/HB 1490; Ga. L. 2020, p. 827, § 2-3/HB 998; Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 52/HB 1428; Ga. L. 2022, p. 762, § 1/SB 469.

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 5, 2020, added new paragraph (1) and redesignated former paragraph (1) as paragraph (1.1).

The 2022 amendments.

The first 2022 amendment, effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided, however, that” for “provided, however,” in paragraph (25). The second 2022 amendment, effective July 1, 2022, substituted “approved by the regulations of the commandant of” for “approved as Type I, Type II, Type III, Type IV, or Type V (Hybrid) by” in paragraph (18); added paragraph (26); and redesignated former paragraph (26) as present paragraph (27).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, “lienholder” was substituted for “lien holder” in the first sentence of paragraph (16).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, a comma was deleted following “marine toilet” in paragraph (8).

52-7-4.
Requirement as to numbering of vessels; titling; requirements for hull damaged vessels.

Every vessel using the waters of this state shall be numbered, except those vessels exempted by Code Section 52-7-6 and those vessels documented by the United States Coast Guard and licensed pursuant to Code Section 27-2-8. No person shall operate or give permission for the operation of any such vessel on the waters of this state unless the vessel is numbered in accordance with this article or in accordance with applicable federal law or in accordance with a federally approved numbering system of another state and unless:

The certificate of number issued to the vessel is on board and in full force and effect; and

The identifying number set forth in the certificate of number is properly displayed on each side of the forward half of the vessel; provided, however, that this requirement shall not apply to numbered vessels which are documented by the United States Coast Guard.

Every vessel using the waters of this state shall be titled unless it is exempt from the numbering requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section or exempt under Code Section 52-7-7. No person shall operate or give permission for the operation of any such vessel on the waters of this state unless the vessel is titled in accordance with this article. Every outboard motor greater than 25 horsepower used to propel a titled vessel shall be included on the vessel title.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this Code section, at or before the time the owner of record transfers an ownership interest in a hull damaged vessel that is covered by a certificate of number created by the department, if the damage occurred while such person was an owner of the vessel and the person has notice of the damage at the time of the transfer, the owner shall:

Deliver to the department an application for a new certificate of number that includes the title brand designation “Hull Damaged”; or

Indicate on the certificate of title or on the bill of sale or other transfer document in the place designated for such purpose that the vessel is hull damaged and deliver the certificate or other transfer document to the transferee.

Not later than 20 days after delivery to the department of the application under paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of this Code section or the delivery to the transferee of the certificate of title or bill of sale under paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Code section, the department shall create a new record that indicates that the vessel is branded “Hull Damaged.”

Before an insurer transfers an ownership interest in a hull damaged vessel that is covered by a certificate of number created by the department, the insurer shall deliver to the department an application for a new certificate that includes the title brand designation “Hull Damaged.” Not later than 20 days after delivery of the application to the department, the department shall create a new record which indicates that the vessel is branded “Hull Damaged.”

An owner of record that fails to comply with subsection (c) of this Code section, a person that solicits or colludes in a failure by an owner of record to comply with subsection (c) of this Code section, or an insurer that fails to comply with subsection (e) of this Code section is subject to a civil penalty of $1,000.00.

For the purposes of this Code section, the term “Hull Damaged” means compromised with respect to the integrity of a vessel’s hull by a collision, allision, lightning strike, fire, explosion, running aground, or similar occurrence that creates a significant risk to the integrity of the vessel’s hull.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 235, § 5; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 4; Ga. L. 1987, p. 567, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 410, § 2; Ga. L. 2019, p. 755, § 3/HB 314.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, designated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a) and added subsections (b) through (g).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 755, § 1/HB 314, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Uniform Certificate of Title for Vessels Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 755, § 2/HB 314, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) Titles for vessels in this state would deter and impede theft;

“(2) Titles for vessels in this state would facilitate the ownership, transfer, and financing of such vessels; and

“(3) Titling of vessels would create equity and fairness for the selling of vessels by dealers, brokers, agents, private parties, and manufacturers.”

52-7-5.
Numbering of vessels; requirements; fees.

The owner of each vessel required to be numbered by this article shall file an application for a certificate of number with the department on forms containing such information required by the department. Upon receipt of the completed application and any other required information and documents, the department shall enter the application upon its records and issue to the applicant a certificate of number stating the number assigned to the vessel, the name and address of the owner, and such additional information as may be prescribed by the department. The department shall maintain electronic records of title and furnish a physical certificate of title to the owner or lienholder upon request.

The identification number assigned to all registered vessels, except those documented by the United States Coast Guard, shall be permanently painted on or attached to each side of the forward half of the vessel, and no other number may be displayed thereon. Numbers shall read from left to right, be in block characters, be of a color contrasting with the background, and be not less than three inches in height nor more than one inch apart. There shall be a hyphen or space between the prefix letters and numerals and between the numerals and the suffix letters. The hyphen or space shall be equal to the width of any letter except I.

On vessels so configured that a number on the hull or superstructure would not be easily visible, the number shall be painted on or attached to a backing plate that is attached to the forward half of the vessel so that the number will be clearly visible under normal operating conditions.

The numbers shall be maintained in a legible condition.

Vessels owned by manufacturers or dealers and being used as demonstrators or for testing on state waters may use the dealer’s tag supplied with his or her registration in lieu of a permanently attached number. Such vessels owned by manufacturers and dealers and only used as demonstrators or for testing using a dealer’s tag shall not be required to be titled.

Expiration decals shall be assigned by the department to all registered vessels. Such decals shall be displayed one on each side of the bow preceding the prefix letters and maintained in legible condition. There shall be a hyphen or space separating each decal and the prefix letters which shall be equal to the width of any letter except I.

Applications shall be signed by the owner or owners of the vessel and shall be accompanied by the proper fee. Fees for numbering vessels for a registration period of three years shall be as follows:

Vessels up to 16 feet in length $25.00 (2) Vessels 16 to 26 feet in length 60.00 (3) Vessels 26 to 40 feet in length 130.00 (4) Vessels 40 feet in length or longer 200.00

Click to view

After July 1, 2017, the General Assembly shall not increase the cost of any fee provided for in this subsection by more than 20 percent.

Registration for vessels shall expire on the last day of the month of the owner’s birth in the last year of the registration period and shall thereafter be of no force or effect unless renewed pursuant to this article; provided, however, that the registration for vessels not owned by individuals shall expire on December 31 of the last year of the registration period. Certificates of number may be renewed by the owner in the same manner provided for in the initial securing of such certificates.

Registrations may be renewed any time after October 1 prior to the year of expiration. If the certificate of number is allowed to expire, a renewal application may still be filed with the department so long as the applicant pays the registration fee prescribed in subsection (d) of this Code section along with a $10.00 late fee.

Any application which, due to failure of the applicant to provide additional information required by the department, remains incomplete 60 days after initial receipt of such application shall expire, and a new application and registration or title fee shall be required.

Should the ownership of a numbered or titled vessel change while a valid registration or title is in effect, the new owner shall file with the department a new application and pay the prescribed fee for a new registration or title. The number assigned upon transfer of ownership shall be identical to the previous number unless such number has been reassigned by the department during any expired registration or title period.

In the event that an agency of the United States government shall have in force an overall system of identification (numbering) for vessels within the United States, the numbering system employed pursuant to this article by the department shall be in conformity therewith. The provisions for titling employed pursuant to this article by the department shall be in conformity for approval by the United States Coast Guard under provisions of 46 U.S.C. Section 31322(d)(1).

The department may issue any certificate of number, expiration decal, marine toilet certification, title, or other permit or accept applications for registration or titling provided for in this chapter directly or may authorize any person to act as agent for the issuing or collection and maintenance of information thereof. In the event that a person accepts such authorization to issue certificates of title or number, he or she may be allotted a block of numbers and certificates or provided direction and instruction therefor which, upon assignment and issue in conformity with this article and with any rules and regulations of the department, shall be valid as if assigned and issued directly by the department. Any person acting as agent for the department may charge a fee for his or her services in an amount approved by the department not to exceed $10.00 per transaction.

All records of the department made or kept pursuant to this Code section shall be public records.

The owner shall furnish the department notice of the transfer of all or of any part of his or her interest, other than the creation of a security interest, in a vessel numbered in this state pursuant to this Code section, the theft or recovery of the vessel, or the destruction or abandonment of the vessel within 15 days thereof, in a manner specified by the department.

Any holder of a certificate of number or title shall notify the department in writing within 30 days if his or her address no longer conforms to the address appearing on the certificate or title and shall, as a part of such notification, furnish the department with his or her new address.

No number other than the number validly assigned to a vessel shall be painted, attached, or otherwise displayed on either side of the forward half of the vessel.

A certificate of number or title once issued pursuant to this Code section shall be considered void upon the happening of any one of the following events:

The owner transfers all his or her interest in said vessel to another person or involuntarily loses his or her interest through legal process;

The vessel is destroyed or abandoned;

It is discovered by the department that the application submitted by the owner contains false or fraudulent information;

The fees for issuance are not paid by the applicant; or

The state of principal use is changed.

A void certificate or title shall be surrendered to the department within 15 days from the date that it becomes or is declared to be void.

The number placed on the forward half of the vessel by the owner shall be removed by the owner if:

The vessel is documented under the laws of the United States;

The certificate of number or title becomes invalid because it is determined that a false or fraudulent statement was made in the application or the fees have not been paid; or

The vessel is no longer used in this state.

The board shall be authorized to establish, by rule or regulation, a procedure to refund fees collected pursuant to this chapter which were collected in error or overpayment or to which the department or state is otherwise not entitled.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 235, §§ 6, 7; Ga. L. 1965, p. 251, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 487, §§ 3-6; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 6; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1632, §§ 5-7; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1182, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 738, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1981, p. 147, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 52; Ga. L. 1987, p. 567, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 52; Ga. L. 1992, p. 470, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 998, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 351, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1276, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 558, § 5/SB 121; Ga. L. 2013, p. 892, § 1/HB 497; Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 19/HB 208; Ga. L. 2019, p. 755, § 4/HB 314.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, inserted “or title” in paragraph (e)(3), throughout subsections (f) and (k), and in paragraphs (m)(1), (m)(2), and (n)(2); in subsection (a), inserted “a certificate of” in the middle of the first sentence and added the third sentence; inserted “on” in the middle of the first sentence of paragraph (b)(1); in paragraph (b)(4), inserted “on state waters” in the middle of the first sentence and added the second sentence; inserted “or titled” near the beginning of subsection (f); added the second sentence in subsection (g); in subsection (h), in the first sentence, inserted “title,” near the middle, inserted “or accept applications for registration or titling” in the middle, and inserted “or collection and maintenance of information” near the end, and, in the middle of the second sentence, inserted “title or” and inserted “or provided direction and instruction”; substituted “30” for “15” preceding “days” in the middle of subsection (k); and substituted “certificate of number or title” for “certificate or number” near the beginning of paragraph (n)(2).

Cross references.

Identification numbers and letters for commercial fishing boats, §

27-4-117

.

Identification numbers and letters on boats used for taking shrimp, §

27-4-133

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1992, p. 470, §§ 4 and 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provide: “The General Assembly declares its intent to use the increases and changes in fees provided in this Act to fund the acquisition and management of lands and waters, by and through the Department of Natural Resources, for fish hatcheries; for wildlife restoration, propagation, protection, preservation, research, or management; for public hunting, fishing, or trapping; and for related recreational areas. The General Assembly further recognizes the importance of wildlife related recreation and the need to provide greater opportunities for such recreation and public lands in the face of rapid woodland development and appropriation of existing wildlife habitat. The General Assembly further declares its intent to ensure that the funding provided by hunters and fishermen through the payment of these license fee increases and changes will fund the acquisition of fish and wildlife habitat and public recreational areas.

“This Act shall become effective on April 1, 1992, or as soon thereafter as it is approved by the Governor or becomes law without such approval; provided, however, that the fees which are increased in Sections 1 and 3 of this Act shall on March 31, 2012, be reduced to the level of such fees prior to the effective date of this Act.”

Ga. L. 2009, p. 787, § 10/hb 326, eliminated the automatic reduction of rates provided by Ga. L. 1992, p. 470, § 5.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 20/HB 208, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section shall apply to all offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2017.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 755, § 1/HB 314, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Uniform Certificate of Title for Vessels Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 755, § 2/HB 314, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) Titles for vessels in this state would deter and impede theft;

“(2) Titles for vessels in this state would facilitate the ownership, transfer, and financing of such vessels; and

“(3) Titling of vessels would create equity and fairness for the selling of vessels by dealers, brokers, agents, private parties, and manufacturers.”

52-7-6.
Exemptions from numbering requirements.

A vessel shall not be required to be numbered under Code Sections 52-7-4 and 52-7-5 if it is:

Not motor propelled; provided, however, that sailboats 12 feet or more in length shall require registration;

Covered by a certificate of number in full force and effect which has been issued to it pursuant to federal law or a federally approved numbering system of another state, provided that such vessel shall not be used on the waters of this state for a period in excess of 60 consecutive days;

From a country other than the United States, provided that such vessel shall not be used on the waters of this state for a period in excess of 60 consecutive days;

A vessel whose owner is the United States, a state, or a subdivision thereof, which vessel is used exclusively in the nonrecreation public service and which is clearly identifiable as such;

A vessel’s lifeboat if the boat is used solely for lifesaving purposes; this exemption does not include dinghies, tenders, speedboats, or other types of craft carried aboard vessels and used for other than lifesaving purposes;

A vessel that is used exclusively for racing;

A vessel belonging to a class of boats which has been exempted from numbering by the department after the department has found that:

The numbering of vessels of such class will not materially aid in their identification;

An agency of the federal government has a numbering system applicable to the class of vessel to which the vessel in question belongs; and

The vessel would also be exempt from numbering if it were subject to the federal law;

Operating temporarily by virtue of evidence that an application for a certificate of number has been submitted within the previous 60 days; or

Used exclusively on privately owned ponds or lakes, except for those licensed by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 235, § 5; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 5; Ga. L. 1981, p. 147, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 52; Ga. L. 1987, p. 567, § 5; Ga. L. 2006, p. 96, § 4/HB 1490; Ga. L. 2013, p. 892, § 2/HB 497.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, the correct spelling of “exclusively” was substituted in paragraph (9).

52-7-7.
Dealers’ vessels.

Any dealer may obtain certificates of number to be used only for the purpose of testing or demonstrating vessels owned by the dealer. The fee for the first certificate of number issued to any dealer for each vessel classification shall be the same fee as prescribed in subsection (d) of Code Section 52-7-5 and the dealer may then be issued additional certificates of number for testing and demonstrating purposes at a reduced fee as provided by the board. The amount of the reduced fee shall be determined by the board and shall be a reasonable approximation of the cost of producing and distributing the certificates of number and may be changed from time to time.

Dealers shall be authorized to transfer certificates of number issued pursuant to this Code section from one vessel to another vessel in the same classification.

Any dealer desiring certificates of number shall make application for them on standard vessel registration forms which shall be accompanied by an affidavit stating that the applicant is a vessel dealer or manufacturer.

Numbers assigned by such certificates shall be temporarily placed on vessels within the certificate’s class range whenever such vessels are being tested or demonstrated and must be plainly marked “DEALER.” Such temporary placement of numbers shall be as the board shall provide by regulation.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 487, § 7; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 7; Ga. L. 2013, p. 892, § 3/HB 497.

52-7-7.1.
Hull identification numbers required; penalty for violations.

No person shall operate on the waters of this state a vessel manufactured after November 1, 1972, unless the vessel displays an assigned hull identification number as required by the United States Coast Guard or by the issuing authority, except any of those vessels exempted by Code Section 52-7-7.6. The hull identification number shall be carved, burned, stamped, embossed, or otherwise permanently affixed to the outboard side of the transom or the starboard side within two feet of the transom above the waterline in accordance with federal law or as directed by the issuing authority.

No person shall operate on the waters of this state a vessel that was manufactured before November 1, 1972, for which an issuing authority has issued a hull identification number unless the hull identification number is clearly displayed on the hull of the vessel as described in subsection (a) of this Code section.

No person shall destroy, remove, alter, cover, or deface the hull identification number, or any plate or decal bearing such number, of any vessel, except to make necessary repairs that require the removal of the HIN. Immediately upon completion of any repairs requiring the destruction, removal, alteration, covering, or defacing of a vessel’s HIN, the person shall reaffix the hull identification number to the vessel in accordance with federal law or shall apply for a replacement hull identification number from the department.

No person shall assign the same hull identification number to more than one vessel.

Any person who willfully violates subsection (c) or (d) of this Code section with intent to misrepresent the identity of a vessel so as to convert or defraud shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than $500.00 nor more than $5,000.00, by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than five years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-7.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 96, § 5/HB 1490.

52-7-7.2.
Display of hull identification numbers on new vessels.

Each vessel manufactured or built after April 14, 2006, for sale in this state shall have a hull identification number displayed prior to sale or delivery for sale in accordance with federal law and this article. The hull identification number shall not be altered or replaced by the manufacturer or manufacturer’s representative for the purpose of upgrading the model year of a vessel after being offered for sale or delivered to any dealer.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-7.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 96, § 5/HB 1490.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, “April 14, 2006,” was substituted for “the effective date of this Code section” in the first sentence.

52-7-7.3.
Seizure of vessels without hull identification numbers; seizure of related property; inspections.

If the hull identification number on a vessel required by Code Section 52-7-7.1 or 52-7-7.2 to have a hull identification number does not exist or has been altered, removed, destroyed, covered, or defaced or the real identity of the vessel cannot be determined, the vessel, and any items used while towing such vessel, may be seized as contraband by a law enforcement agency or the department and shall be subject to forfeiture in accordance with the procedures set forth in Chapter 16 of Title 9.

A vessel described in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be sold or operated on the waters of the state unless the department:

Receives a request from a law enforcement agency providing adequate documentation for a replacement hull identification number; or

Is directed by written order of a court of competent jurisdiction to issue to the vessel a replacement hull identification number.

The failure to have the hull identification number clearly displayed in compliance with this article shall be probable cause for any law enforcement officer to make further inspection of the vessel in question to ascertain the true identity thereof.

Prior to the vessel being sold or returned to the owner or otherwise disposed of, the department shall assign it a new hull identification number in accordance with federal law.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-7.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 96, § 5/HB 1490; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-30/HB 233.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date.
Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).

52-7-7.4.
[Reserved] Property not subject to replevin; report by law enforcement agency of seizure of property; procedures.

History.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 96, § 5/HB 1490; repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-31/HB 233, effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-31/HB 233 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2015.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 repeal of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2015).

52-7-7.5.
Counterfeit hull identification numbers; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly possess, manufacture, sell or exchange, offer to sell or exchange, aid in the sale or exchange, supply in blank, authorize, direct, or give away any counterfeit HIN, any counterfeit manufacturer’s vessel HIN plate or decal, or any manufacturer’s vessel HIN plate decal which is assigned to a vessel to be used for the purpose of identification of a vessel other than the one to which it is assigned; or to conspire to do any of the foregoing. However, nothing in this subsection shall be applicable to any approved hull identification number plate or decal issued as a replacement by the manufacturer or an issuing authority.

It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly buy, sell, offer for sale, receive, dispose of, conceal, or have in his or her possession any vessel, outboard motor, or part thereof on which the HIN or any manufacturer’s identification label of any kind has been altered, removed, destroyed, covered, or defaced or to knowingly maintain such vessel, outboard motor, or part thereof in any manner which conceals or misrepresents the true identity of the vessel, the outboard motor, or any part thereof.

Any person who violates subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than $500.00 nor more than $5,000.00, by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than five years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-7.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 96, § 5/HB 1490.

52-7-7.6.
Exception to requirement for hull identification numbers.

A vessel shall not be required to have a hull identification number under Code Section 52-7-7.1 or 52-7-7.2 if it is:

An innertube; or

A vessel used exclusively for racing.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-7.6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 96, § 5/HB 1490.